Utah statutes.
31A-25-203.   General requirements for license issuance.
(1)  The commissioner shall issue a license to act as a third party
administrator to a person who:
(a)  satisfies the character requirements under Section 31A-25-204;
(b)  satisfies the financial responsibility requirement under Section
31A-25-205;
(c)  has not committed an act that is a ground for denial, suspension, or
revocation provided in Section 31A-25-208;
(d)  if a nonresident, complies with Section 31A-25-206; and
(e)  pays the applicable fees under Section 31A-3-103.
(2) (a)  This Subsection (2) applies to the following persons:
(i)  an applicant for a third party administrator's license; or
(ii)  a licensed third party administrator.
(b)  A person described in Subsection (2)(a) shall report to the commissioner:
(i)  an administrative action taken against the person:
(A)  in another jurisdiction; or
(B)  by another regulatory agency in this state; and
(ii)  a criminal prosecution taken against the person in any jurisdiction.
(c)  The report required by Subsection (2)(b) shall:
(i)  be filed:
(A)  at the time the person applies for a third party administrator's license;
and
(B)  if an action or prosecution occurs on or after the day on which the
person applies for a third party administrator license:
(I)  for an administrative action, within 30 days of the final disposition of
the administrative action; or
(II)  for a criminal prosecution, within 30 days of the initial appearance
before a court; and
(ii)  include a copy of the complaint or other relevant legal documents
related to the action or prosecution described in Subsection (2)(b).
(3) (a)  The department may require a person applying for a license or for
consent to engage in the business of insurance to submit to a criminal
background check as a condition of receiving a license or consent.
(b)  A person, if required to submit to a criminal background check under
Subsection (3)(a), shall:
(i)  submit a fingerprint card in a form acceptable to the department; and
(ii)  consent to a fingerprint background check by:
(A)  the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification; and
(B)  the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(c)  For a person who submits a fingerprint card and consents to a fingerprint
background check under Subsection (3)(b), the department may request
concerning a person applying for a third party administrator's license:
(i)  criminal background information maintained pursuant to Title 53, Chapter
10, Part 2, Bureau of Criminal Identification, from the Bureau of Criminal
Identification; and
(ii)  complete Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal background checks
through the national criminal history system.
(d)  Information obtained by the department from the review of criminal
history records received under this Subsection (3) shall be used by the
department for the purposes of:
(i)  determining if a person satisfies the character requirements under
Section 31A-25-204 for issuance or renewal of a license;
(ii)  determining if a person has failed to maintain the character
requirements under Section 31A-25-204; and
(iii)  preventing a person who violates the federal Violent Crime Control and
Law Enforcement Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. Secs. 1033 and 1034, from engaging in
the business of insurance in the state.
(e)  If the department requests the criminal background information, the
department shall:
(i)  pay to the Department of Public Safety the costs incurred by the
Department of Public Safety in providing the department criminal background
information under Subsection (3)(c)(i);
(ii)  pay to the Federal Bureau of Investigation the costs incurred by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation in providing the department criminal
background information under Subsection (3)(c)(ii); and
(iii)  charge the person applying for a license or for consent to engage in
the business of insurance a fee equal to the aggregate of Subsections
(3)(e)(i) and (ii).
(4)  The commissioner may deny a license application to act as a third party
administrator to a person who:
(a)  fails to satisfy the requirements of this section; or
(b)  commits an act that is a ground for denial, suspension, or revocation
provided in Section 31A-25-208.
